Maine, session 132, LD47.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §12457, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2013, c. 499, §1, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (5) to read:
(5) There is no fishing in or from the fishway at the Sheepscot Lake Dam in the
Town of Palermo in Waldo County, Chain of Ponds Dam in Chain of Ponds
Township in Franklin County, Long Pond Dam in Seven Ponds Township in
Franklin County, Beaver Pond Dam in Seven Ponds Township in Franklin County,
Little Island Pond Dam in Seven Ponds Township in Franklin County, Pushaw
Lake Dam in the Town of Hudson in Penobscot County, Davis Pond Dam in the
Town of Eddington in Penobscot County, Leonard's Mills Dam on Blackman
Stream in the Town of Bradley in Penobscot County, Souadabscook Stream Dam
at Grist Mill Road in the Town of Carmel in Penobscot County and, Webber Pond
Page 1 - 132LR0245(03)

Dam in the Town of Vassalboro in Kennebec County and Crooked Brook Dam in
the Town of Danforth in Washington County;
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR0245(03)